Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB613.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2003-H(b)(2) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 2003-H. Comparison tool.* * *(b) Requirements.--The comparison tool required under this section must:* * *(2) Allow a user to identify and compare institutions of higher education by the following:* * *(xi) The endowment of each institution of higher 1234567891011121314151617181920 education.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0613PN0626 - 2 - 123